Louisiana, session 2026, SB33.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:51.1.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§51.1.2. Earned benefits for children in foster care
A. For all children in custody of the Department of Children and Family
Services, the department shall determine within sixty days after entry into care
whether a child is receiving or is eligible for earned federal benefits
administered by the United States Social Security Administration or the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs, including survivors' or dependent
benefits.
B. If the department determines that a child is eligible or may be eligible
for such earned benefits, the department shall apply for the benefits on behalf
of the child in accordance with federal law.
C. If a child is already receiving earned federal benefits before entering
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-193 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 33
the department's care, or if the department applies for benefits on behalf of the
child, the department shall, in consultation with the child and the child's
attorney, identify an appropriate representative payee consistent with 20 CFR
Sections 404.2021 and 416.621 and apply to become the representative payee if
no other suitable candidate is available.
D. If the department is appointed to serve as the representative payee,
the department shall:
(1) Not use any of the child's earned federal benefits, savings, or assets
to pay for or reimburse the department or the state for any cost of the child's
care, maintenance, supervision, or services.
(2) Establish and maintain an account to conserve the child's earned
benefits without interfering with the child's eligibility for public benefits.
(3) Provide an annual accounting of the use, application, or conservation
of the child's earned benefits to the child and the child's attorney.
E. The department shall provide written notice to the child and the
child's attorney of any application for benefits, decision, appeal, or appellate
determination related to the child's earned benefits.
F. If benefits are denied, the department shall consult with the child's
attorney and appeal the denial.
G. The department shall review each case annually to determine whether
a child in care has become newly eligible for earned federal benefits after the
department's initial determination.
H. Upon termination of the department's custody or legal responsibility
for the child, the department shall release any conserved funds as follows:
(1) To the child, if the child is at least eighteen years of age or
emancipated.
(2) To the person responsible for the child, if the child remains a minor
and is not emancipated.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-193 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 33